src-fst-morphology-affixes-verbs.lexc.md
Verb inflection
The Somali language verbs inflect in persons.

Full            Reduced
1Sg    A               A
2Sg    B               A
3SgM   A               A
3SgF   B               B
1Pl    C               C
2Pl    D               A
3Pl    E               A

Present         Past
1Sg    keenaa          keenay
2Sg    keentaa         keentay
3SgM   keenaa          keenay
3SgF   keentaa         keentay
1Pl    keennaa         keennay
2Pl    keentaan        keenteen
3Pl    keenaan         keenaan

Present         Past
1Sg    keénayaa        keénayay
2Sg    keénaysaa       keénaysay
3SgM   keénayaa        keénayay
3SgF   keénaysaa       keénaysay
1Pl    keénaynaa       keénaynay
2Pl    keénaysaan      keénayseen
3Pl    keénayaan       keénayeen

Apply post-root tones, and other root triggers

* * *

<small>This (part of) documentation was generated from [src/fst/morphology/affixes/verbs.lexc](https://github.com/giellalt/lang-som/blob/main/src/fst/morphology/affixes/verbs.lexc)</small>

---
